Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20178-1,135
Appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the director made pursuant to section 8-1,134 may appeal the order, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1984, LB 1039, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 125.
August 24, 2017
Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.